Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
76-3108
Transfer, defined.

Transfer means sale, gift, conveyance,
assignment, inheritance, or other transfer of an ownership interest in real
property located in this state.

Laws 2011, LB26, § 8.